Iowa, session 2025-2026, HSB237.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 1653YC (7) 91 jm/jh H.F. _____ Section 1. Section 422.11O, subsection 5, paragraph b, Code 1 2025, is amended to read as follows: 2 b. This subsection is repealed January 1, 2026 2031 . 3 Sec. 2. Section 422.11O, subsection 8, Code 2025, is amended 4 to read as follows: 5 8. This section is repealed January 1, 2028 2031 . 6 Sec. 3. Section 422.11P, subsection 8, Code 2025, is amended 7 to read as follows: 8 8. This section is repealed January 1, 2028 2031 . 9 Sec. 4. Section 422.11Y, subsection 9, Code 2025, is amended 10 to read as follows: 11 9. This section is repealed January 1, 2026 2031 . 12 Sec. 5. Section 422.33, subsection 11B, paragraph c, Code 13 2025, is amended to read as follows: 14 c. This subsection is repealed January 1, 2028 2031 . 15 Sec. 6. Section 422.33, subsection 11C, paragraph c, Code 16 2025, is amended to read as follows: 17 c. This subsection is repealed January 1, 2028 2031 . 18 Sec. 7. Section 422.33, subsection 11D, paragraph c, Code 19 2025, is amended to read as follows: 20 c. This subsection is repealed January 1, 2026 2031 . 21 Sec. 8. Section 423.4, subsection 9, paragraph e, Code 2025, 22 is amended to read as follows: 23 e. This subsection is repealed January 1, 2028 2031 . 24 Sec. 9. 2006 Iowa Acts, chapter 1142, section 49, subsection 25 3, as amended by 2011 Iowa Acts, chapter 113, section 20, 2016 26 Iowa Acts, chapter 1106, section 6, and 2022 Iowa Acts, chapter 27 1067, section 47, is amended to read as follows: 28 3. For a retail dealer who may claim an E-85 gasoline 29 promotion tax credit under section 422.11O or 422.33, 30 subsection 11B , as enacted in this Act and amended in 31 subsequent Acts, in calendar year 2027 2030 and whose tax 32 year ends prior to December 31, 2027 2030 , the retail dealer 33 may continue to claim the tax credit in the retail dealerâs 34 following tax year. In that case, the tax credit shall be 35 -1- LSB 1653YC (7) 91 jm/jh 1/ 4 H.F. _____ calculated in the same manner as provided in section 422.11O 1 or 422.33, subsection 11B , as enacted in this Act and amended 2 in subsequent Acts, for the remaining period beginning on the 3 first day of the retail dealerâs new tax year until December 4 31, 2027 2030 . For that remaining period, the tax credit shall 5 be calculated in the same manner as a retail dealer whose tax 6 year began on the previous January 1 and who is calculating the 7 tax credit on December 31, 2027 2030 . 8 Sec. 10. 2011 Iowa Acts, chapter 113, section 31, as amended 9 by 2016 Iowa Acts, chapter 1106, section 10, and 2022 Iowa 10 Acts, chapter 1067, section 52, is amended to read as follows: 11 SEC. 31. TAX CREDIT AVAILABILITY. For a retail dealer 12 who may claim a biodiesel blended fuel promotion tax credit 13 under section 422.11P or 422.33, subsection 11C , as amended 14 in this Act and amended in subsequent Acts, in calendar year 15 2027 2030 , and whose tax year ends prior to December 31, 2027 16 2030 , the retail dealer may continue to claim the tax credit in 17 the retail dealerâs following tax year. In that case, the tax 18 credit shall be calculated in the same manner as provided in 19 section 422.11P or 422.33, subsection 11C , as amended in this 20 Act and amended in subsequent Acts, for the remaining period 21 beginning on the first day of the retail dealerâs new tax year 22 until December 31, 2027 2030 . For that remaining period, the 23 tax credit shall be calculated in the same manner as a retail 24 dealer whose tax year began on the previous January 1 and who 25 is calculating the tax credit on December 31, 2027 2030 . 26 Sec. 11. 2011 Iowa Acts, chapter 113, section 37, as amended 27 by 2016 Iowa Acts, chapter 1106, section 3, and 2022 Iowa Acts, 28 chapter 1067, section 57, is amended to read as follows: 29 SEC. 37. TAX CREDIT AVAILABILITY. For a retail dealer who 30 may claim an E-15 plus gasoline promotion tax credit under 31 section 422.11Y or 422.33, subsection 11D , as enacted in this 32 Act and amended in subsequent Acts, in calendar year 2025 33 2030 , and whose tax year ends prior to December 31, 2025 2030 , 34 the retail dealer may continue to claim the tax credit in the 35 -2- LSB 1653YC (7) 91 jm/jh 2/ 4 H.F. _____ retail dealerâs following tax year. In that case, the tax 1 credit shall be calculated in the same manner as provided in 2 section 422.11Y or 422.33, subsection 11D , as enacted in this 3 Act and amended in subsequent Acts, for the remaining period 4 beginning on the first day of the retail dealerâs new tax year 5 until December 31, 2025 2030 . For that remaining period, the 6 tax credit shall be calculated in the same manner as a retail 7 dealer whose tax year began on the previous January 1 and who 8 is calculating the tax credit on December 31, 2025 2030 . 9